Nebraska, session 109, LB215A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB215A LB215A
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $122,000 from the
General Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $125,966 from the General Fund for
FY2026-27 to the Board of Parole, for Program 358, to aid in carrying out
the provisions of Legislative Bill 215, One Hundred Ninth Legislature,
First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per
diems from funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $85,400
for FY2025-26 or $88,015 for FY2026-27.
-2-